Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.63.120

Administration and enforcement.

In order to carry into effect the purposes of this chapter, administrative and enforcement responsibilities, other than those set forth in RCW 35A.63.110, may be assigned by ordinance to such departments, boards, officials, employees, or agents as the legislative body deems appropriate.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.63.120.]